South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 30-4-40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (f) A jail, detention center, correctional facility, or other public body may not disclose a recording of a telephone conversation of an inmate and his visitor made by the facility in which the inmate is incarcerated. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----